District of Columbia statutes.
20-721

Duty to account; supervised administration.

Except as provided in section 20-731 , a supervised personal representative shall prepare verified written accounts of the management and distribution of the decedent’s property at the times and in the manner prescribed in this subchapter. The personal representative shall file the account with a certificate that there has been mailed or delivered to all interested persons, within the previous 15 days, a copy of the account with a notice that the account will be filed on or before a stated date.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(nn), 42 DCR 63
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.
1981 Ed., § 20-721.
This section is referenced in § 20-725, § 20-731, § 20-732, and § 20-733.